District of Columbia statutes.
50-1731.05

Additional restrictions on use of mobile telephone or other electronic devices by school bus drivers and holders of learner’s permits.

(a)

A person shall not use a mobile telephone or other electronic device, including those with hands-free accessories, while operating a moving school bus that is carrying passengers; provided, that this section shall not apply to a school bus driver who places an emergency call to school officials or to the exceptions set forth in § 50-1731.04(b).

(b)

A person who holds a learner’s permit shall be prohibited from using any mobile telephone or other electronic device, including those with hands-free accessories, while operating a moving motor vehicle on a public highway except in an emergency, as set forth in § 50-1731.04(b).

Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-124, § 5, 51 DCR 1541
This section is referenced in § 50-1731.06.